Utah statutes.
42-3-3.   Transfer of name.
When any owner of a farm, the name of which has been recorded as provided in
this chapter, transfers by deed or otherwise the whole of such farm, the
transfer may include the registered name thereof; but, if the owner shall
transfer only a portion of such farm, the registered name thereof shall not be
deemed transferred, unless so stated in the conveyance.
